South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5653.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 1 of Act 843 of 1952, as last amended by Act 278 of 1979, is amended to read: Section 1.   (A) The central authority of Lee County's educational system shall be the county board of education consisting of seven members. One member shall be elected from and be a resident of each of the single-member election districts from which members of the county council are elected. (B) Members shall be elected in nonpartisan elections held at the same time as the general election in November of each even-numbered year for terms of four years and assume office on January second of the year following election and shall serve until their successors are elected and qualify. Of those initially elected in 1980 three members shall serve until January 2, 1983, and four members shall serve until January 2, 1985. Length of terms for those initially elected shall be determined by lot at the first meeting of the elected board.Members from districts 1, 2, 3, and 7 must be elected in 2028 until their successors are elected and qualify. Members from districts 4, 5, and 6 must be elected in 2030 and until their successors are elected and qualify. (C) All persons desiring to qualify as a candidate and be elected to the board shall file a statement of intention of candidacy with the Lee County Board of Voter Registration and Elections as provided in Section 7-13-352. (D) A vacancy on the board must be filled by appointment upon a majority vote of the Lee County Legislative Delegation for the unexpired portion of the term. (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each member of the board may receive compensation in an amount not to exceed six thousand dollars annually. The board may, by majority vote, increase the compensation of its members; provided, any increase in compensation may not take effect until the commencement of the next term of office for those members. (F) The board is hereby constituted the Board of Trustees for the School District of Lee County with all the powers and responsibilities as prescribed in Section 59-15-10 of the 1976 S.C. Code. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----